District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.05

Notice of registration of order.

(a)

When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of the District shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

(b)

A notice must inform the nonregistering party:

(1)

That a registered support order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of the District;

(2)

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within 20 days after notice unless the registered order is under § 46-357.07;

(3)

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages; and

(4)

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

(c)

If the registering party asserts that 2 or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

(1)

Identify the 2 or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

(2)

Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

(3)

State that the procedures provided in subsection (b) of this section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

(4)

State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

(d)

Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer pursuant to Chapter 2 of this title [§ 46-201 et seq.].

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 605, 63 DCR 222